Maine, session 132, LD2145.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17906, sub-§2, ¶B, as repealed and replaced by PL 1987, c. 458,
§1, is amended to read:
B. Disability retirement benefits shall must be calculated as follows:
(1) The initial disability retirement benefit shall must be reduced if necessary so
that the benefit plus any benefits under paragraph A do not exceed 80% of the
beneficiary's average final compensation;
(2) Subsequent cost-of-living adjustments applied to any benefit listed under
paragraph A shall must be excluded from the calculations under subparagraph (1);
(3) Adjustments under section 17806 shall must be applied to that portion of
disability retirement benefits calculated under subparagraph (1); and
(4) If a beneficiary receives a benefit under paragraph C, the 80% limit under
subparagraph (1) shall may not include adjustments under section 17806.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §17930, sub-§4, ¶B, as enacted by PL 1989, c. 409, §§8 and 12,
is amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The initial disability retirement benefit shall must be reduced if necessary so
that the benefit plus any benefits under paragraph A do not exceed 80% of the
person's average final compensation;
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §18506, sub-§2, ¶A, as amended by PL 1993, c. 680, Pt. A, §17,
is further amended to read:
A. The amount of any disability retirement benefit payable under this article must be
reduced by any amount received by the beneficiary for the same disability under either
or both of the following:
(1) The workers' compensation or similar law, except amounts that may be paid
or payable under former Title 39, section 56‑B or Title 39‑A, section 212,
subsection 3; or.
(2) The United States Social Security Act, if the employment for which creditable
service with the employer is allowed was also covered under that Act at the date
of disability retirement.
Sec. 4. 5 MRSA §18506, sub-§2, ¶B, as repealed and replaced by PL 1987, c. 458,
§2, is amended to read:
B. Disability retirement benefits shall must be calculated as follows:
(1) The initial disability retirement benefit shall must be reduced if necessary so
that the benefit plus any benefits under paragraph A do not exceed 80% of the
beneficiary's average final compensation;
(2) Subsequent cost-of-living adjustments applied to any benefit listed under
paragraph A shall must be excluded from the calculations under subparagraph (1);
(3) Adjustments under section 18407 shall must be applied to that portion of
disability retirement benefits calculated under subparagraph (1); and
Page 1 - 132LR2785(01)

(4) If a beneficiary receives a benefit under paragraph C, the 80% limit under
subparagraph (1) shall may not include adjustments under section 18407.
Sec. 5. 5 MRSA §18530, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2003, c. 328, §1, is further
amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The initial disability retirement benefit must be reduced if necessary so that
the benefit plus any benefits under paragraph A do not exceed 80% of the person's
average annual earnings. For the purposes of this subparagraph, "average annual
earnings" means the total of the person's average final compensation plus other
wages and earnings from employment for the calendar year in which the person
has the highest total of other wages and earnings from employment during the 5
years immediately preceding the year in which the person became disabled average
final compensation;